Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6399.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 111e. (1) The grounds for action by the director under section 111d(1) and the actions to which they may be applied shall be are as follows: (a) The director may take action under section 111d(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (f) for a provider's failure to disclose the information required by section 111b(7), (19), or (25). (b) The director may take action under section 111d(1)(a) for a provider's failure to properly apply for enrollment and to submit documentation specified by the director under section 111a(7)(c). (c) The director may take action under section 111d(1)(b), (c), or (f) for a any of the following: (i) A provider's failure to furnish proper certification to the director pursuant to under section 111b(17). , or for a (ii) A provider's failure to comply with section 111b(26). , or for a (iii) A provider's failure to comply with, or attempt to circumvent, section 111a(7)(e). (d) The director may take action under section 111d(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) for a provider's failure to conform to professionally accepted standards of medical practice. (e) The director may take action under section 111d(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (f) for an employer's failure to comply with section 111b(27). (f) The director may take action under section 111d(1)(a), (b), (c), or (f) for a provider's failure to comply with section 111b(1), (2), (3), or (4). (2) The director shall take action under section 111d(1)(a) or (c) if any of the following occurs: (a) The provider is convicted of violating the medicaid Medicaid false claims claim act, Act No. 72 of the Public Acts of 1977, being sections 400.601 to 400.613 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1977 PA 72, MCL 400.601 to 400.615, the health care false claims claim act, Act No. 323 of the Public Acts of 1984, being sections 752.1001 to 752.1011 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1984 PA 323, MCL 752.1001 to 752.1011, or a substantially similar statute of another state or the federal government. (b) The provider is convicted of, or pleads guilty to, a criminal offense or attempted criminal offense relating to the provider's practice of health care in any jurisdiction. (c) The provider continues, or reinitiates, a pattern of practice for which the provider was sanctioned previously under this act. For purposes of this subdivision, "sanction" means those actions prescribed in sections 111a(7)(d) and 111d(1)(a) to (f). (d) The provider dispenses, renders, or provides services, supplies, or equipment without a practitioner's prescription or order. (e) The provider attempts to circumvent or fails to comply with section 111b(7). (f) The provider is suspended or terminated as a provider from participation in the medicaid medical assistance or medicare Medicare program, or other governmentally supported program in any jurisdiction. (3) The director shall take action under section 111d(1)(a), (b), (c),(d), or (f) if any of the following occurs: (a) The provider continues to submit duplicate claims for services, supplies, or equipment for which the provider has already received reimbursement from any source after receiving notice from the department to stop submitting duplicate claims, ; or the provider receives reimbursement from any other source after receiving medicaid Â payment under the medical assistance program and does not refund the appropriate portion of the medicaid payment received under the medical assistance program to the department. (b) The provider submits a claim for services, supplies, or equipment that was not provided to a recipient. (c) The provider submits a claim for services, supplies, or equipment that includes costs or charges not related to those services, supplies, or equipment actually provided to the recipient. (d) The provider continues to submit claims for services, supplies, or equipment, or continues to refer recipients to another provider by referral, order, or prescription for services, supplies, or equipment, which that are not documented in the record in the prescribed manner, are medically inappropriate or medically unnecessary, or are below the acceptable medical treatment standards, after receiving notice from the department to cease that practice. This subdivision does not apply to a nursing home or hospital unless the nursing home or hospital acted on its own initiative in providing the service, supply, or equipment as opposed to following the order or prescription of another. (e) The Subject to subsection (11), the provider continues to submit claims that misrepresent any of the following after receiving notice from the department to cease that practice: (i) The description of services, supplies, or equipment dispensed or provided. ; the (ii) The dates of services. ; the (iii) The identity of the recipient. ; the (iv) The identity of the attending, prescribing, or referring practitioner. ; or the (v) The identity of the actual provider. , after receiving notice from the state department to cease the practice. As used in this subdivision, "misrepresentation" does not include the submission of a claim in compliance with specific written policies and procedures issued by the state department and approved by the director or the director's designee. (f) The provider submits a claim for which the documentation in a patient's medical record or chart contains misleading or inaccurate information regarding the diagnosis, treatment, or cause of a patient's condition ; or the documentation in a patient's medical record or chart has been altered or destroyed so that an ongoing audit or overpayment action cannot adequately be pursued by the department. (g) The provider fails to complete the required fields on the claim form or fails to provide required information related to the claim after receiving notice from the department to complete the required fields or to provide the required information. (h) The provider submits a claim for reimbursement for services, supplies, or equipment for a fee or charge that is higher than the provider's usual, customary charge to the general public for the same services, supplies, or equipment. (i) The provider submits a claim for services, supplies, or equipment that was not rendered by the provider. (j) The provider is serving a sentence in a correctional facility. (4) The director shall not take action under section 111d(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) because the provider is convicted of, or pleads guilty to, a criminal offense or attempted criminal offense that is not fraud, an offense described under 42 USC 1320a-7(b) or related to the provider's practice of health care unless either of the following applies: (a) The director is required to take the action under federal law and the action taken by the director is not more stringent than the action required under federal law. (b) The criminal offense or attempted criminal offense is a crime described in section 20173a(1) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20173a, or section 134a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1134a. (5) (4) A provider subject to an action or proposed action by the director under this section shall be is entitled to a hearing held in conformity with chapter chapters 4 and chapter 6 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, Act No. 306 of the Public Acts of 1969, being sections 24.271 to 24.287 and 24.301 to 24.306 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288 and 24.301 to 24.306. (6) (5) In Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), in addition to or in place of the grounds specified in subsection (1), (2), or (3), the director may base an action provided for in section 111d(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) on his or her the director's judgment that the action is necessary to protect the health of medically indigent individuals, the welfare of the public, and the funds appropriated for the program. (7) (6) Any An individual against whom charged with an enrollment sanction has been levied under this section shall not participate directly or indirectly in the medicaid medical assistance program during the pendency of the enrollment sanction. (8) (7) The Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9), the director may reinstate the participation in the medical services assistance program of an individual against whom charged with an enrollment sanction has been levied under this section if the director makes a determination that the reinstatement is in the best interests of the medical services assistance program and the medical care of recipients. (9) If an individual was charged with an enrollment sanction under this section before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection because of a criminal offense or attempted criminal offense that is not related to the provider's practice of health care, the director shall allow reinstatement of the individual's participation in the medical assistance program unless 1 of the following applies: (a) The director is required to deny reinstatement under federal law. (b) The criminal offense or attempted criminal offense is a crime described in section 20173a(1) of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20173a, or section 134a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1134a. (c) The individual was charged with another enrollment sanction under this section for a reason not prohibited by subsection (4) and the decision not to reinstate the individual's participation in the medical assistance program is based on that other enrollment sanction. (10) The director shall update the department's policies and procedures to reflect the changes made by the amendatory act that added this subsection. (11) As used in subsection (3)(e), "misrepresent" does not include the submission of a claim in compliance with specific written policies and procedures issued by the department and approved by the director or the director's designee.